New York, session 2025-2026, S4474.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 20 of the social services law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 9 to read as follows: 3 9. The office of temporary and disability assistance shall promulgate 4 rules and regulations requiring that the department, or a local social 5 services district where appropriate, shall each year conduct a minimum 6 of four full unannounced inspections of each facility which is used to 7 shelter homeless persons within the state, with at least one full 8 inspection performed each quarter. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08747-01-5